Illinois, session 104th, HB5735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to Youth 7Guidance for costs associated with contingent and operational 8expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.